th: ประเภทไฟส่องสว่างฝาครอบหัวต่อรถยนต์: ไฟเบรก; LED ตกแต่ง (โลโก้/ไฟประดับ); ไม่มี; สะท้อนแสง (ไม่ต้องใช้ไฟฟ้า); ไฟถอยหลัง; ไฟวิ่ง/ไฟมาร์กเกอร์; ไฟเลี้ยว; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės vilkimo kablio dangtelio apšvietimo tipas: Stabdžių žibintas; Dekoratyvinis LED (logotipas / akcentas); Nėra; Atspindintis (be maitinimo); Atbulinės eigos žibintas; Gabaritinis / kontūro žibintas; Posūkio signalas; Kita
nl: Voertuigtrekhaakafdekking verlichtingstype: Remlicht; Decoratieve led (logo/accent); Geen; Reflecterend (zonder stroom); Achteruitrijlicht; Dagrijverlichting/markeringslicht; Knipperlicht; Overig
de: Beleuchtungsart der Anhängerkupplungsabdeckung: Bremslicht; Dekorative LED (Logo/Akzent); Keine; Reflektierend (ohne Strom); Rückfahrlicht; Tagfahr-/Markierungslicht; Blinker; Sonstiges
sv: Typ av belysning för dragkrokskydd: Bromsljus; Dekorativ LED (logotyp/accent); Ingen; Reflekterande (strömlös); Backljus; Kör-/positionsljus; Blinkers; Övrigt
ko: 차량 견인 장치 커버 조명 유형: 브레이크등; 장식용 LED(로고/액센트); 없음; 반사형(무전원); 후진등; 주행등/마커등; 방향지시등; 기타
sk-SK: Typ osvetlenia krytu ťažného zariadenia: Brzdové svetlo; Dekoratívne LED (logo/akcent); Žiadny; Reflexné (bez napájania); Cúvacie svetlo; Obrysové/pozičné svetlo; Smerové svetlo; Iné
tr: Araç çeki demiri kapağı aydınlatma tipi: Fren lambası; Dekoratif LED (logo/vurgu); Yok; Reflektörlü (güç desteksiz); Geri vites lambası; Seyir/işaret lambası; Sinyal lambası; Diğer
en: Vehicle hitch cover illumination type: Brake light; Decorative LED (logo/accent); None; Reflective (non-powered); Reverse light; Running/marker light; Turn signal; Other
ro-RO: Tipul de iluminare a capacului cârligului de remorcare: Lumină de frână; LED decorativ (logo/accent); Niciunul; Reflectorizant (nealimentat); Lumină de marșarier; Lumină de poziție/de gabarit; Lumină de semnalizare; Altele
fr: Type d’éclairage du cache d’attelage: Feu de freinage; LED décorative (logo/accent); Aucune; Réfléchissant (sans alimentation); Feu de recul; Feu de position/gabarit; Clignotant; Autre
pt-BR: Capa de engate veicular tipo de iluminação: Luz de freio; LED decorativo (logotipo/detalhe); Nenhum; Refletivo (sem energia); Luz de ré; Luz de posição/marcação; Luz de seta; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta osvjetljenja poklopca kuke za prikolicu vozila: Kočiono svjetlo; Ukrasni LED (logotip/naglasak); Nema; Reflektirajuće (bez napajanja); Svjetlo za vožnju unatrag; Pozicijsko/gabaritno svjetlo; Pokazivač smjera; Ostalo
zh-CN: 车辆挂钩盖照明类型: 刹车灯; 装饰性 LED (徽标/重点照明); 无; 反光 (无电源); 倒车灯; 行车灯/示宽灯; 转向灯; 其他
fi: Ajoneuvon vetokoukun suojuksen valaistuksen tyyppi: Jarruvalo; Koristeellinen LED (logo/korostus); Ei mitään; Heijastava (ei sähköinen); Peruutusvalo; Ajovalo / äärivalo; Suuntavilkku; Muu
nb: Belysningstype for kjøretøyets tilhengerfeste: Bremselys; Dekorativ LED (logo/aksent); Ingen; Reflekterende (uten strøm); Ryggelys; Kjørelys / markeringslys; Blinklys; Annet
it: Tipo di illuminazione del coprigancio del veicolo: Luce di stop; LED decorativo (logo/dettaglio); Nessuna; Riflettente (senza alimentazione); Luce di retromarcia; Luce di posizione; Indicatore di direzione; Altro
ru: Тип подсветки крышки фаркопа: Стоп-сигнал; Декоративный светодиод (логотип/акцент); Нет; Светоотражающий (без питания); Фонарь заднего хода; Ходовой/габаритный огонь; Указатель поворота; Другое
bg-BG: Тип осветяване на капака на теглича на превозното средство: Светлина за спирачка; Декоративен LED (лого/акцент); Няма; Отразяващ (без захранване); Светлина за заден ход; Дневна/габаритна светлина; Мигач; Друго
vi: Loại đèn chiếu sáng nắp móc kéo xe: Đèn phanh; Đèn LED trang trí (logo/viền); Không có; Phản quang (không dùng điện); Đèn lùi; Đèn chạy ban ngày/đèn định vị; Đèn xi nhan; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de iluminação da cobertura do engate do veículo: Luz de travão; LED decorativo (logótipo/destaque); Nenhum; Refletor (sem energia); Luz de marcha-atrás; Luz de presença/marcador; Pisca; Outro
el: Τύπος φωτισμού καλύμματος κοτσαδόρου οχήματος: Φως φρένων; Διακοσμητικό LED (λογότυπο/πινελιές); Κανένα; Ανακλαστικό (χωρίς τροφοδοσία); Φως όπισθεν; Φως πορείας/θέσης; Φλας; Άλλο
pl: Typ podświetlenia osłony haka pojazdu: Światło hamowania; Ozdobne diody LED (logo/akcent); Brak; Odblaskowe (bez zasilania); Światło cofania; Światło pozycyjne/obrysowe; Kierunkowskaz; Inne
da: Belysningstype for cover til anhængertræk: Bremselys; Dekorativ LED (logo/accent); Ingen; Reflekterende (uden strøm); Baklys; Køre-/markeringslys; Blinklys; Andet
cs: Typ osvětlení krytu tažného zařízení vozidla: Brzdové světlo; Dekorativní LED (logo/akcent); Žádné; Reflexní (bez napájení); Couvací světlo; Obrysové/poziční světlo; Směrové světlo; Jiné
hu: Jármű vonóhorog-burkolatának megvilágítási típusa: Féklámpa; Dekoratív LED (logó/díszítés); Nincs; Fényvisszaverő (nem áramellátásos); Tolatólámpa; Nappali menetfény / Helyzetjelző; Irányjelző; Egyéb
ja: 車両用ヒッチカバー照明タイプ: ブレーキランプ; 装飾用 LED (ロゴ/アクセント); なし; 反射式 (非電源); バックランプ; ランニング/マーカーランプ; ウィンカー; その他
es: Tipo de iluminación de la cubierta del enganche del vehículo: Luz de freno; LED decorativo (logotipo/acento); Ninguno; Reflectante (sin alimentación); Luz de marcha atrás; Luz de marcha/marcadora; Luz direccional; Otro
zh-TW: 拖車架用保護罩照明類型: 煞車燈; 裝飾性 LED (標誌/重點照明); 無; 反光 (無電源); 倒車燈; 晝行燈/側標燈; 方向燈; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta osvetlitve pokrova vlečne kljuke vozila: Zavorna luč; Dekorativna LED-luč (logotip/poudarek); Brez; Odsevno (brez napajanja); Luč za vzvratno vožnjo; Pozicijska/označevalna luč; Smernik; Drugo